Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. Boxing

§ 6001.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Boxer” means an individual who participates in a boxing match.

“Boxing match” or “match” means a contest or training exhibition for a prize or purse where an admission fee is charged and where individuals score points by striking the head and upper torso of an opponent with padded fists. An amateur match is a match held under the supervision of a school, college, or university; under the supervision of United States Amateur Boxing, Inc. or its successor as the nationally designated governing body for amateur boxing; or, for any other amateur match, under the supervision of a nationally designated governing body. All other matches shall be considered professional matches.

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Disciplinary action” includes any action by the administrative law officer appointed under

3 V.S.A. § 129

, premised upon a finding of wrongdoing. It includes all sanctions of any kind, including denying, suspending, or revoking a registration and issuing warnings.

“Health care provider” means a health care practitioner licensed in Vermont who is permitted under the practitioner’s statutory or regulatory scope of practice to conduct the types of examinations set forth in this subchapter.

“Manager” means a person who receives compensation for service as an agent or representative of a professional boxer.

“National Boxer Registry” means an entity certified by the Association of Boxing Commissions for the purpose of maintaining records for the identification of professional boxers and for tracking their records and suspensions.

“Participant” means managers, seconds, referees, and judges in a professional boxing match.

“Promoter” means a person that organizes, holds, advertises, or otherwise conducts a professional boxing match.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 65;

2021, No. 69

, §§ 15a, 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1101

).

§ 6002.
Director; powers; duties.

The Director shall have jurisdiction over professional boxing matches. The Director’s power to supervise professional boxing matches includes the power to suspend a match immediately if there is a serious and immediate danger to the public, boxers, promoters, or participants.

Except as provided in this subsection, the Director shall not have jurisdiction over amateur boxing matches. Amateur boxing matches shall be conducted according to the rules of United States Amateur Boxing, Inc., the national governing body for amateur boxing of the U.S. Olympic Committee or its successor as the nationally designated governing body for amateur boxing. However, upon a finding that the health and safety of the boxers and participants in an amateur match are not being sufficiently safeguarded, the Director shall assume jurisdiction over and supervisory responsibility for the match. The Director’s decision may be appealed to the administrative law officer appointed under

3 V.S.A. § 129

within 10 days of the date the finding is issued. If the Director assumes jurisdiction under this subsection, the match shall continue to be conducted in accordance with the rules of United States Amateur Boxing, Inc.
(b) (1) Except as provided in this subsection, the Director shall not have jurisdiction over amateur boxing matches. Amateur boxing matches shall be conducted according to the rules of United States Amateur Boxing, Inc., the national governing body for amateur boxing of the U.S. Olympic Committee or its successor as the nationally designated governing body for amateur boxing. However, upon a finding that the health and safety of the boxers and participants in an amateur match are not being sufficiently safeguarded, the Director shall assume jurisdiction over and supervisory responsibility for the match. The Director’s decision may be appealed to the administrative law officer appointed under

3 V.S.A. § 129

within 10 days of the date the finding is issued. If the Director assumes jurisdiction under this subsection, the match shall continue to be conducted in accordance with the rules of United States Amateur Boxing, Inc.

For the purposes of this subsection, an “amateur boxing match” means a match held under the supervision of a school, college, or university or under the supervision of United States Amateur Boxing, Inc. or its successor as the nationally designated governing body for amateur boxing.

The Director shall:

provide information to applicants for registration;

administer fees collected under this subchapter;

explain appeal procedures to registrants and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

receive applications for registration, grant registration under this subchapter, renew registrations, and deny, revoke, suspend, reinstate, or condition registrations as directed by an administrative law officer;

refer all complaints and disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer appointed under

3 V.S.A. § 129

.

The Director may adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this subchapter. The uniform rules of the Association of Boxing Commissions as adopted on June 6, 1998, and as amended from time to time, shall apply to professional boxing matches conducted under this subchapter to the extent those rules address matters not covered by rules adopted by the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 66;

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1102

).

§ 6003.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two persons to serve as advisors in matters related to boxing. One advisor shall be a person with at least three years’ experience with boxing, and one shall be a medical doctor. The advisor appointees shall be appointed for staggered five-year terms and shall serve at the pleasure of the Secretary.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisors appointed under this section in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter. The advisors shall be entitled to compensation and necessary expenses in the amount provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

for attendance at any meeting called by the Director for this purpose.

For purposes of the federal Professional Boxing Safety Act of 1995, as amended, the Director and the advisor appointees shall be deemed to be the Vermont State Boxing Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1103

).

§ 6004.
Professional boxer registration; match registration.

In order to participate in a professional boxing match in this State, a boxer shall possess an identification card issued by the National Boxer Registry.

A professional boxer who is a resident of this State or a resident of another state or country without a boxing commission may obtain a National Boxer Registry identification card by registering with the Office of Professional Regulation. The registration application shall be in the form prescribed by the Director and shall include any information required by the Director in order to verify the applicant’s identity. The application shall be accompanied by the required fee.

The Director shall issue a photo identification card to each boxer registered under this section. The card shall contain the personal identification number assigned to that boxer by the National Boxer Registry. Registrations may be renewed every two years upon payment of the required fee.

Before each professional boxing match and no later than the weigh-in, each boxer shall present the photo identification card issued under this section to the Director’s agent, who shall verify the identification card and check it against the records of the National Boxer Registry before a boxer shall be allowed to participate in the match. A boxer who fails to present a valid identification card shall not be allowed to participate in the match.

The Director shall establish procedures for evaluating the records of professional boxers and, when appropriate, for denying authorization to participate in a match.

A boxer shall not be allowed to participate in a professional match if the boxer is under suspension in another state.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1104

).

§ 6005.
Promoters; registration; bond requirement.

A person shall not act as a promoter in this State unless he or she is registered with the Office of Professional Regulation. The application shall be made on forms provided by the Director and shall be filed at least 14 days prior to the date of the intended professional boxing match.

Each application shall be accompanied by a surety or cash bond in the amount of $5,000.00, payable to the State of Vermont, together with proof of medical insurance covering the boxers for injuries sustained during the match. The bond or surety shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance by the promoter of the provisions of this subchapter, the fulfillment of the promoter’s contractual obligations with the boxers and participants, and subject to the payment of any fees or penalties imposed by this subchapter.

Each application shall contain a list of the boxers and participants, along with each boxer’s personal identification number assigned by the National Boxer Registry.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1105

).

§ 6006.
Participants; registration.

A person shall not act as a participant in this State unless he or she is registered with the Office of Professional Regulation. The application shall be made on forms provided by the Director and shall be filed at least 14 days prior to the date the applicant first intends to act as a participant in this State. Registrations may be renewed every two years upon payment of the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1106

).

§ 6007.
Matches; medical suspensions.

Medical suspensions of professional boxers shall be determined by following the guidelines issued by the Association of Boxing Commissions as adopted and as may be amended from time to time. A boxer may be suspended for a recent knockout, a series of losses, a required medical procedure, a health care provider’s denial of certification, the failure of a drug test, or for other reasons outlined in this subchapter or rules adopted under this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 67;

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1107

).

§ 6008.
Matches; special provisions.

The Director shall designate one or more individuals who shall act as boxing inspectors for professional boxing matches and, at the discretion of the Director, at amateur boxing matches to ensure that boxing laws and rules are strictly observed. Boxing inspectors shall have all the powers of the Director with regard to regulation of a match. Inspectors shall have free access to the dressing rooms of the boxers and shall be present at the weigh-in.

Before a professional match, the promoter shall ensure that each boxer is examined by a health care provider for the purpose of certifying that the boxer is physically fit to compete safely. Copies of the health care provider’s certificate shall be filed with the Director prior to the match. In addition, at any time prior to a professional match, the Director may require that a boxer undergo a physical examination, which may include neurological tests and procedures.

A health care provider approved by the Director must be continuously present at ringside during every professional boxing match to observe the physical condition of the boxers. The health care provider shall advise the referee on the condition of the boxers.

The promoter shall ensure that an ambulance and medical personnel, with appropriate resuscitation equipment, are continuously present at the site during a professional boxing match.

A person under the age of 18 shall not participate in any professional match, as that term is described in subdivision 6001(2) of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 68;

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1108

).

§ 6009.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated by this subchapter shall be subject to the following fees:

Promoter registration $500.00 (2) Boxer registration $ 25.00 (3) Manager registration $ 25.00 (4) Second registration $ 25.00 (5) Referee registration $ 25.00 (6) Judge registration $ 25.00 (7) Biennial renewal for professional $ 25.00 boxers, managers, seconds, referees, and judges

Click to view

If the Director exercises jurisdiction over an amateur match under section 6002 of this title, the person that organized, held, advertised, or otherwise conducted the match shall pay a fee of $500.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1109

).

§ 6010.
Reports to be filed; professional boxing.

Within 24 hours of the conclusion of a professional match (excluding weekends or national holidays), the promoter or designee shall file a written report with the Director, on a form prescribed by the Director, indicating the specific result of each match and any problems encountered in the running of the event.

Within 48 hours of the conclusion of the professional match (excluding weekends or national holidays), the Director or designee shall report the results of the match to the National Boxer Registry or registries as designated by the Association of Boxing Commissions.

Within 48 hours of any final disciplinary action against a boxer, promoter, or manager (excluding weekends or national holidays), the Director or designee shall report any final disciplinary action taken against a promoter, boxer, or manager to the National Boxer Registry or registries as designated by the Association of Boxing Commissions.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1110

).

§ 6011.
Report to be filed; amateur boxing.

No more than seven days after the conclusion of an amateur boxing match, the United States Amateur Boxing, Inc. representative shall file a report with the Director certifying complete compliance with the rules of USA Boxing, summarizing the results of the event, and detailing any problems encountered during the event.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1111

).

§ 6012.
Grounds for disciplinary actions.

An applicant or a registrant shall be subject to disciplinary action for the conduct listed in this section and in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

:

A boxer, for fighting after failing a pre-fight physical examination.

A promoter:

for permitting a nonregistered boxer to participate in a match; or

for participating in a match or allowing a boxer or other participant to participate in a match while under suspension in another state or by another boxing regulatory organization.

A promoter, boxer, or participant, for violating any requirement of this subchapter or any rule adopted under this subchapter.

After hearing, and upon a finding of wrongdoing, the administrative law officer appointed under subsection

3 V.S.A. § 129(j)

may take disciplinary action against a registrant or an applicant.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1112

).

§ 6013.
Tax on professional boxing contests.

Any person holding or conducting a professional boxing match shall notify the Director not less than five days in advance of the holding of the match, and after the match is concluded shall immediately pay to the Director a sum, designated as a gate tax, which shall be an amount equal to five percent of the gross receipts, exclusive of any federal tax thereon. Gate tax shall be deposited in the Professional Regulatory Fee Fund and used to carry out the provisions of this subchapter. Payments required by this section shall be accompanied by reports in the form required by the Director. All tickets of admission to a professional boxing match shall bear clearly the purchase price on the face of the ticket.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 37, eff. Jan. 1, 2001; amended

2021, No. 69

, § 16(b) (redesignated from

31 V.S.A. § 1113

).